src/scripts/Slovak/unicodechars.foma
# SPDX-License-Identifier: GPL-3.0-or-later

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

#Do not edit, file automatically generated.
#
#For pg2p:
define NormalizeCharactersBase 
[%à|%â|%ầ|%Ầ|%ấ|%Ấ|%ẫ|%Ẫ|%ẩ|%Ẩ|%ã|%ā|%Ā|%ă|%Ă|%ằ|%Ằ|%ắ|%Ắ|%ẵ|%Ẵ|%ẳ|%Ẳ|%ȧ|%Ȧ|%ǡ|%Ǡ|%ả|%Ả|%å|%ǻ|%Ǻ|%ǎ|%Ǎ|%ȁ|%Ȁ|%ȃ|%Ȃ|%ą|%Ą|%𝐚|%𝐀|%𝑎|%𝐴|%𝒂|%𝑨|%𝒶|%𝒜|%𝓪|%𝓐|%𝔞|%𝔄|%𝕒|%𝔸|%𝖆|%𝕬|%𝖺|%𝖠|%𝗮|%𝗔|%𝘢|%𝘈|%𝙖|%𝘼|%𝚊|%𝙰|%ⱥ|%Ⱥ|%ɐ|%Ɐ|%ａ|%Ａ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ḃ|%Ḃ|%𝐛|%𝐁|%𝑏|%𝐵|%𝒃|%𝑩|%𝒷|%𝓫|%𝓑|%𝔟|%𝔅|%𝕓|%𝔹|%𝖇|%𝕭|%𝖻|%𝖡|%𝗯|%𝗕|%𝘣|%𝘉|%𝙗|%𝘽|%𝚋|%𝙱|%ƀ|%Ƀ|%ɓ|%Ɓ|%ƃ|%Ƃ|%ʙ|%ｂ|%Ｂ] -> {b} || _ ,,
[%ć|%Ć|%ḉ|%Ḉ|%ĉ|%Ĉ|%ċ|%Ċ|%ç|%ḉ|%Ḉ|%𝐜|%𝐂|%𝑐|%𝐶|%𝒄|%𝑪|%𝒸|%𝒞|%𝓬|%𝓒|%𝔠|%𝕔|%𝖈|%𝕮|%𝖼|%𝖢|%𝗰|%𝗖|%𝘤|%𝘊|%𝙘|%𝘾|%𝚌|%𝙲|%ƈ|%Ƈ|%ȼ|%Ȼ|%ɕ|%ʗ|%ｃ|%Ｃ] -> {c} || _ ,,
[%ḋ|%Ḋ|%ḑ|%Ḑ|%𝐝|%𝐃|%𝑑|%𝐷|%𝒅|%𝑫|%𝒹|%𝒟|%𝓭|%𝓓|%𝔡|%𝔇|%𝕕|%𝔻|%𝖉|%𝕯|%𝖽|%𝖣|%𝗱|%𝗗|%𝘥|%𝘋|%𝙙|%𝘿|%𝚍|%𝙳|%đ|%Đ|%ɖ|%Ɖ|%ɗ|%Ɗ|%ƌ|%Ƌ|%ȡ|%ȸ|%ｄ|%Ｄ] -> {d} || _ ,,
[%è|%ê|%ề|%Ề|%ế|%Ế|%ễ|%Ễ|%ể|%Ể|%ẽ|%Ẽ|%ē|%Ē|%ḕ|%Ḕ|%ḗ|%Ḗ|%ĕ|%Ĕ|%ḝ|%Ḝ|%ė|%Ė|%ë|%ẻ|%Ẻ|%ȅ|%Ȅ|%ȇ|%Ȇ|%ȩ|%Ȩ|%ḝ|%Ḝ|%ę|%Ę|%𝐞|%𝐄|%𝑒|%𝐸|%𝒆|%𝑬|%𝓮|%𝓔|%𝔢|%𝔈|%𝕖|%𝔼|%𝖊|%𝕰|%𝖾|%𝖤|%𝗲|%𝗘|%𝘦|%𝘌|%𝙚|%𝙀|%𝚎|%𝙴|%ǝ|%Ǝ|%ɛ|%Ɛ|%ɇ|%Ɇ|%ɘ|%ɜ|%Ɜ|%ɝ|%ɞ|%ɶ|%ʚ|%ｅ|%Ｅ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ḟ|%Ḟ|%𝐟|%𝐅|%𝑓|%𝐹|%𝒇|%𝑭|%𝒻|%𝓯|%𝓕|%𝔣|%𝔉|%𝕗|%𝔽|%𝖋|%𝕱|%𝖿|%𝖥|%𝗳|%𝗙|%𝘧|%𝘍|%𝙛|%𝙁|%𝚏|%𝙵|%ｆ|%Ｆ] -> {f} || _ ,,
[%ǵ|%Ǵ|%ĝ|%Ĝ|%ḡ|%Ḡ|%ğ|%Ğ|%ġ|%Ġ|%ǧ|%Ǧ|%ģ|%Ģ|%𝐠|%𝐆|%𝑔|%𝐺|%𝒈|%𝑮|%𝒢|%𝓰|%𝓖|%𝔤|%𝔊|%𝕘|%𝔾|%𝖌|%𝕲|%𝗀|%𝖦|%𝗴|%𝗚|%𝘨|%𝘎|%𝙜|%𝙂|%𝚐|%𝙶|%ɠ|%Ɠ|%ǥ|%Ǥ|%ɡ|%Ɡ|%ɢ|%ʛ|%ｇ|%Ｇ] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%ĥ|%Ĥ|%ḣ|%Ḣ|%ḧ|%Ḧ|%ȟ|%Ȟ|%ḩ|%Ḩ|%𝐡|%𝐇|%𝐻|%𝒉|%𝑯|%𝒽|%𝓱|%𝓗|%𝔥|%𝕙|%𝖍|%𝕳|%𝗁|%𝖧|%𝗵|%𝗛|%𝘩|%𝘏|%𝙝|%𝙃|%𝚑|%𝙷|%ħ|%Ħ|%ɥ|%Ɥ|%ɦ|%Ɦ|%ʜ|%ʮ|%ʯ|%ｈ|%Ｈ] -> {h} || _ ,,
[%ì|%î|%ĩ|%Ĩ|%ī|%Ī|%ĭ|%Ĭ|%ï|%ḯ|%Ḯ|%ỉ|%Ỉ|%ǐ|%Ǐ|%ȉ|%Ȉ|%ȋ|%Ȋ|%į|%Į|%𝐢|%𝐈|%𝑖|%𝐼|%𝒊|%𝑰|%𝒾|%𝓲|%𝓘|%𝔦|%𝕚|%𝕀|%𝖎|%𝕴|%𝗂|%𝖨|%𝗶|%𝗜|%𝘪|%𝘐|%𝙞|%𝙄|%𝚒|%𝙸|%ı|%ɩ|%Ɩ|%ɨ|%Ɨ|%ɪ|%Ɪ|%ｉ|%Ｉ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ĵ|%Ĵ|%ǰ|%𝐣|%𝐉|%𝑗|%𝐽|%𝒋|%𝑱|%𝒿|%𝒥|%𝓳|%𝓙|%𝔧|%𝔍|%𝕛|%𝕁|%𝖏|%𝕵|%𝗃|%𝖩|%𝗷|%𝗝|%𝘫|%𝘑|%𝙟|%𝙅|%𝚓|%𝙹|%ȷ|%ɉ|%Ɉ|%ɟ|%ʄ|%ʝ|%Ʝ|%ｊ|%Ｊ] -> {j} || _ ,,
[%ḱ|%Ḱ|%ǩ|%Ǩ|%ķ|%Ķ|%𝐤|%𝐊|%𝑘|%𝐾|%𝒌|%𝑲|%𝓀|%𝒦|%𝓴|%𝓚|%𝔨|%𝔎|%𝕜|%𝕂|%𝖐|%𝕶|%𝗄|%𝖪|%𝗸|%𝗞|%𝘬|%𝘒|%𝙠|%𝙆|%𝚔|%𝙺|%ƙ|%Ƙ|%ʞ|%Ʞ|%ｋ|%Ｋ] -> {k} || _ ,,
[%ļ|%Ļ|%𝐥|%𝐋|%𝑙|%𝐿|%𝒍|%𝑳|%𝓁|%𝓵|%𝓛|%𝔩|%𝔏|%𝕝|%𝕃|%𝖑|%𝕷|%𝗅|%𝖫|%𝗹|%𝗟|%𝘭|%𝘓|%𝙡|%𝙇|%𝚕|%𝙻|%ł|%Ł|%ƚ|%Ƚ|%ȴ|%ɫ|%Ɫ|%ɬ|%Ɬ|%ɭ|%ʟ|%ｌ|%Ｌ] -> {l} || _ ,,
[%ḿ|%Ḿ|%ṁ|%Ṁ|%𝐦|%𝐌|%𝑚|%𝑀|%𝒎|%𝑴|%𝓂|%𝓶|%𝓜|%𝔪|%𝔐|%𝕞|%𝕄|%𝖒|%𝕸|%𝗆|%𝖬|%𝗺|%𝗠|%𝘮|%𝘔|%𝙢|%𝙈|%𝚖|%𝙼|%ɯ|%Ɯ|%ɰ|%ɱ|%Ɱ|%ｍ|%Ｍ] -> {m} || _ ,,
[%ǹ|%Ǹ|%ń|%Ń|%ñ|%ṅ|%Ṅ|%ņ|%Ņ|%𝐧|%𝐍|%𝑛|%𝑁|%𝒏|%𝑵|%𝓃|%𝒩|%𝓷|%𝓝|%𝔫|%𝔑|%𝕟|%𝖓|%𝕹|%𝗇|%𝖭|%𝗻|%𝗡|%𝘯|%𝘕|%𝙣|%𝙉|%𝚗|%𝙽|%ɲ|%Ɲ|%ƞ|%Ƞ|%ȵ|%ɳ|%ɴ|%ｎ|%Ｎ] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%ò|%õ|%ṍ|%Ṍ|%ȭ|%Ȭ|%ṏ|%Ṏ|%ō|%Ō|%ṑ|%Ṑ|%ṓ|%Ṓ|%ǭ|%Ǭ|%ŏ|%Ŏ|%ȯ|%Ȯ|%ȱ|%Ȱ|%ỏ|%Ỏ|%ő|%Ő|%ǒ|%Ǒ|%ȍ|%Ȍ|%ȏ|%Ȏ|%ǫ|%Ǫ|%ǭ|%Ǭ|%𝐨|%𝐎|%𝑜|%𝑂|%𝒐|%𝑶|%𝒪|%𝓸|%𝓞|%𝔬|%𝔒|%𝕠|%𝕆|%𝖔|%𝕺|%𝗈|%𝖮|%𝗼|%𝗢|%𝘰|%𝘖|%𝙤|%𝙊|%𝚘|%𝙾|%ɔ|%Ɔ|%ɵ|%Ɵ|%ｏ|%Ｏ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ṕ|%Ṕ|%ṗ|%Ṗ|%𝐩|%𝐏|%𝑝|%𝑃|%𝒑|%𝑷|%𝓅|%𝒫|%𝓹|%𝓟|%𝔭|%𝔓|%𝕡|%𝖕|%𝕻|%𝗉|%𝖯|%𝗽|%𝗣|%𝘱|%𝘗|%𝙥|%𝙋|%𝚙|%𝙿|%ƥ|%Ƥ|%ｐ|%Ｐ] -> {p} || _ ,,
[%𝐪|%𝐐|%𝑞|%𝑄|%𝒒|%𝑸|%𝓆|%𝒬|%𝓺|%𝓠|%𝔮|%𝔔|%𝕢|%𝖖|%𝕼|%𝗊|%𝖰|%𝗾|%𝗤|%𝘲|%𝘘|%𝙦|%𝙌|%𝚚|%𝚀|%ɋ|%Ɋ|%ʠ|%ｑ|%Ｑ] -> {q} || _ ,,
[%ṙ|%Ṙ|%ȑ|%Ȑ|%ȓ|%Ȓ|%ŗ|%Ŗ|%𝐫|%𝐑|%𝑟|%𝑅|%𝒓|%𝑹|%𝓇|%𝓻|%𝓡|%𝔯|%𝕣|%𝖗|%𝕽|%𝗋|%𝖱|%𝗿|%𝗥|%𝘳|%𝘙|%𝙧|%𝙍|%𝚛|%𝚁|%ɍ|%Ɍ|%ɹ|%ɺ|%ɻ|%ɼ|%ɽ|%Ɽ|%ɾ|%ɿ|%ʁ|%ｒ|%Ｒ] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%ś|%Ś|%ṥ|%Ṥ|%ŝ|%Ŝ|%ṡ|%Ṡ|%ș|%Ș|%ş|%Ş|%𝐬|%𝐒|%𝑠|%𝑆|%𝒔|%𝑺|%𝓈|%𝒮|%𝓼|%𝓢|%𝔰|%𝔖|%𝕤|%𝕊|%𝖘|%𝕾|%𝗌|%𝖲|%𝘀|%𝗦|%𝘴|%𝘚|%𝙨|%𝙎|%𝚜|%𝚂|%ȿ|%Ȿ|%ʂ|%Ʂ|%ｓ|%Ｓ] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%ṫ|%Ṫ|%ẗ|%ț|%Ț|%ţ|%Ţ|%𝐭|%𝐓|%𝑡|%𝑇|%𝒕|%𝑻|%𝓉|%𝒯|%𝓽|%𝓣|%𝔱|%𝔗|%𝕥|%𝕋|%𝖙|%𝕿|%𝗍|%𝖳|%𝘁|%𝗧|%𝘵|%𝘛|%𝙩|%𝙏|%𝚝|%𝚃|%ŧ|%Ŧ|%ƫ|%ƭ|%Ƭ|%ʈ|%Ʈ|%ȶ|%ⱦ|%Ⱦ|%ʇ|%Ʇ|%ｔ|%Ｔ] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%ù|%û|%ũ|%Ũ|%ṹ|%Ṹ|%ū|%Ū|%ṻ|%Ṻ|%ŭ|%Ŭ|%ủ|%Ủ|%ű|%Ű|%ǔ|%Ǔ|%ȕ|%Ȕ|%ȗ|%Ȗ|%ų|%Ų|%𝐮|%𝐔|%𝑢|%𝑈|%𝒖|%𝑼|%𝓊|%𝒰|%𝓾|%𝓤|%𝔲|%𝔘|%𝕦|%𝕌|%𝖚|%𝖀|%𝗎|%𝖴|%𝘂|%𝗨|%𝘶|%𝘜|%𝙪|%𝙐|%𝚞|%𝚄|%ʉ|%Ʉ|%ｕ|%Ｕ] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%ṽ|%Ṽ|%𝐯|%𝐕|%𝑣|%𝑉|%𝒗|%𝑽|%𝓋|%𝒱|%𝓿|%𝓥|%𝔳|%𝔙|%𝕧|%𝕍|%𝖛|%𝖁|%𝗏|%𝖵|%𝘃|%𝗩|%𝘷|%𝘝|%𝙫|%𝙑|%𝚟|%𝚅|%ʋ|%Ʋ|%ʌ|%Ʌ|%ｖ|%Ｖ] -> {v} || _ ,,
[%ẁ|%Ẁ|%ẃ|%Ẃ|%ŵ|%Ŵ|%ẇ|%Ẇ|%ẅ|%Ẅ|%ẘ|%𝐰|%𝐖|%𝑤|%𝑊|%𝒘|%𝑾|%𝓌|%𝒲|%𝔀|%𝓦|%𝔴|%𝔚|%𝕨|%𝕎|%𝖜|%𝖂|%𝗐|%𝖶|%𝘄|%𝗪|%𝘸|%𝘞|%𝙬|%𝙒|%𝚠|%𝚆|%ʍ|%ｗ|%Ｗ] -> {w} || _ ,,
[%ẋ|%Ẋ|%ẍ|%Ẍ|%𝐱|%𝐗|%𝑥|%𝑋|%𝒙|%𝑿|%𝓍|%𝒳|%𝔁|%𝓧|%𝔵|%𝔛|%𝕩|%𝕏|%𝖝|%𝖃|%𝗑|%𝖷|%𝘅|%𝗫|%𝘹|%𝘟|%𝙭|%𝙓|%𝚡|%𝚇|%ｘ|%Ｘ] -> {x} || _ ,,
[%ỳ|%Ỳ|%ŷ|%Ŷ|%ỹ|%Ỹ|%ȳ|%Ȳ|%ẏ|%Ẏ|%ÿ|%Ÿ|%ỷ|%Ỷ|%ẙ|%𝐲|%𝐘|%𝑦|%𝑌|%𝒚|%𝒀|%𝓎|%𝒴|%𝔂|%𝓨|%𝔶|%𝔜|%𝕪|%𝕐|%𝖞|%𝖄|%𝗒|%𝖸|%𝘆|%𝗬|%𝘺|%𝘠|%𝙮|%𝙔|%𝚢|%𝚈|%ƴ|%Ƴ|%ɏ|%Ɏ|%ʎ|%ʏ|%ｙ|%Ｙ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ź|%Ź|%ẑ|%Ẑ|%ż|%Ż|%𝐳|%𝐙|%𝑧|%𝑍|%𝒛|%𝒁|%𝓏|%𝒵|%𝔃|%𝓩|%𝔷|%𝕫|%𝖟|%𝖅|%𝗓|%𝖹|%𝘇|%𝗭|%𝘻|%𝘡|%𝙯|%𝙕|%𝚣|%𝚉|%ƶ|%Ƶ|%ȥ|%Ȥ|%ɀ|%Ɀ|%ʐ|%ʑ|%ｚ|%Ｚ] -> {z} || _ ,,
[%ƻ] -> {2} || _ ;

#For tok (character(s) to single letter):
define UnicodeToNativeTranslitTok 
[%à|%â|%ầ|%Ầ|%ấ|%Ấ|%ẫ|%Ẫ|%ẩ|%Ẩ|%ã|%ā|%Ā|%ă|%Ă|%ằ|%Ằ|%ắ|%Ắ|%ẵ|%Ẵ|%ẳ|%Ẳ|%ȧ|%Ȧ|%ǡ|%Ǡ|%ả|%Ả|%å|%ǻ|%Ǻ|%ǎ|%Ǎ|%ȁ|%Ȁ|%ȃ|%Ȃ|%ą|%Ą|%𝐚|%𝐀|%𝑎|%𝐴|%𝒂|%𝑨|%𝒶|%𝒜|%𝓪|%𝓐|%𝔞|%𝔄|%𝕒|%𝔸|%𝖆|%𝕬|%𝖺|%𝖠|%𝗮|%𝗔|%𝘢|%𝘈|%𝙖|%𝘼|%𝚊|%𝙰|%ⱥ|%Ⱥ|%ɐ|%Ɐ|%ａ|%Ａ] -> a || _ ,,
[%ḃ|%Ḃ|%𝐛|%𝐁|%𝑏|%𝐵|%𝒃|%𝑩|%𝒷|%𝓫|%𝓑|%𝔟|%𝔅|%𝕓|%𝔹|%𝖇|%𝕭|%𝖻|%𝖡|%𝗯|%𝗕|%𝘣|%𝘉|%𝙗|%𝘽|%𝚋|%𝙱|%ƀ|%Ƀ|%ɓ|%Ɓ|%ƃ|%Ƃ|%ʙ|%ｂ|%Ｂ] -> b || _ ,,
[%ć|%Ć|%ḉ|%Ḉ|%ĉ|%Ĉ|%ċ|%Ċ|%ç|%ḉ|%Ḉ|%𝐜|%𝐂|%𝑐|%𝐶|%𝒄|%𝑪|%𝒸|%𝒞|%𝓬|%𝓒|%𝔠|%𝕔|%𝖈|%𝕮|%𝖼|%𝖢|%𝗰|%𝗖|%𝘤|%𝘊|%𝙘|%𝘾|%𝚌|%𝙲|%ƈ|%Ƈ|%ȼ|%Ȼ|%ɕ|%ʗ|%ｃ|%Ｃ] -> c || _ ,,
[%ḋ|%Ḋ|%ḑ|%Ḑ|%𝐝|%𝐃|%𝑑|%𝐷|%𝒅|%𝑫|%𝒹|%𝒟|%𝓭|%𝓓|%𝔡|%𝔇|%𝕕|%𝔻|%𝖉|%𝕯|%𝖽|%𝖣|%𝗱|%𝗗|%𝘥|%𝘋|%𝙙|%𝘿|%𝚍|%𝙳|%đ|%Đ|%ɖ|%Ɖ|%ɗ|%Ɗ|%ƌ|%Ƌ|%ȡ|%ȸ|%ｄ|%Ｄ] -> d || _ ,,
[%è|%ê|%ề|%Ề|%ế|%Ế|%ễ|%Ễ|%ể|%Ể|%ẽ|%Ẽ|%ē|%Ē|%ḕ|%Ḕ|%ḗ|%Ḗ|%ĕ|%Ĕ|%ḝ|%Ḝ|%ė|%Ė|%ë|%ẻ|%Ẻ|%ȅ|%Ȅ|%ȇ|%Ȇ|%ȩ|%Ȩ|%ḝ|%Ḝ|%ę|%Ę|%𝐞|%𝐄|%𝑒|%𝐸|%𝒆|%𝑬|%𝓮|%𝓔|%𝔢|%𝔈|%𝕖|%𝔼|%𝖊|%𝕰|%𝖾|%𝖤|%𝗲|%𝗘|%𝘦|%𝘌|%𝙚|%𝙀|%𝚎|%𝙴|%ǝ|%Ǝ|%ɛ|%Ɛ|%ɇ|%Ɇ|%ɘ|%ɜ|%Ɜ|%ɝ|%ɞ|%ɶ|%ʚ|%ｅ|%Ｅ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ḟ|%Ḟ|%𝐟|%𝐅|%𝑓|%𝐹|%𝒇|%𝑭|%𝒻|%𝓯|%𝓕|%𝔣|%𝔉|%𝕗|%𝔽|%𝖋|%𝕱|%𝖿|%𝖥|%𝗳|%𝗙|%𝘧|%𝘍|%𝙛|%𝙁|%𝚏|%𝙵|%ｆ|%Ｆ] -> f || _ ,,
[%ǵ|%Ǵ|%ĝ|%Ĝ|%ḡ|%Ḡ|%ğ|%Ğ|%ġ|%Ġ|%ǧ|%Ǧ|%ģ|%Ģ|%𝐠|%𝐆|%𝑔|%𝐺|%𝒈|%𝑮|%𝒢|%𝓰|%𝓖|%𝔤|%𝔊|%𝕘|%𝔾|%𝖌|%𝕲|%𝗀|%𝖦|%𝗴|%𝗚|%𝘨|%𝘎|%𝙜|%𝙂|%𝚐|%𝙶|%ɠ|%Ɠ|%ǥ|%Ǥ|%ɡ|%Ɡ|%ɢ|%ʛ|%ｇ|%Ｇ] -> g || _ ,,
[%ĥ|%Ĥ|%ḣ|%Ḣ|%ḧ|%Ḧ|%ȟ|%Ȟ|%ḩ|%Ḩ|%𝐡|%𝐇|%𝐻|%𝒉|%𝑯|%𝒽|%𝓱|%𝓗|%𝔥|%𝕙|%𝖍|%𝕳|%𝗁|%𝖧|%𝗵|%𝗛|%𝘩|%𝘏|%𝙝|%𝙃|%𝚑|%𝙷|%ħ|%Ħ|%ɥ|%Ɥ|%ɦ|%Ɦ|%ʜ|%ʮ|%ʯ|%ｈ|%Ｈ] -> h || _ ,,
[%ì|%î|%ĩ|%Ĩ|%ī|%Ī|%ĭ|%Ĭ|%ï|%ḯ|%Ḯ|%ỉ|%Ỉ|%ǐ|%Ǐ|%ȉ|%Ȉ|%ȋ|%Ȋ|%į|%Į|%𝐢|%𝐈|%𝑖|%𝐼|%𝒊|%𝑰|%𝒾|%𝓲|%𝓘|%𝔦|%𝕚|%𝕀|%𝖎|%𝕴|%𝗂|%𝖨|%𝗶|%𝗜|%𝘪|%𝘐|%𝙞|%𝙄|%𝚒|%𝙸|%ı|%ɩ|%Ɩ|%ɨ|%Ɨ|%ɪ|%Ɪ|%ｉ|%Ｉ] -> i || _ ,,
[%ĵ|%Ĵ|%ǰ|%𝐣|%𝐉|%𝑗|%𝐽|%𝒋|%𝑱|%𝒿|%𝒥|%𝓳|%𝓙|%𝔧|%𝔍|%𝕛|%𝕁|%𝖏|%𝕵|%𝗃|%𝖩|%𝗷|%𝗝|%𝘫|%𝘑|%𝙟|%𝙅|%𝚓|%𝙹|%ȷ|%ɉ|%Ɉ|%ɟ|%ʄ|%ʝ|%Ʝ|%ｊ|%Ｊ] -> j || _ ,,
[%ḱ|%Ḱ|%ǩ|%Ǩ|%ķ|%Ķ|%𝐤|%𝐊|%𝑘|%𝐾|%𝒌|%𝑲|%𝓀|%𝒦|%𝓴|%𝓚|%𝔨|%𝔎|%𝕜|%𝕂|%𝖐|%𝕶|%𝗄|%𝖪|%𝗸|%𝗞|%𝘬|%𝘒|%𝙠|%𝙆|%𝚔|%𝙺|%ƙ|%Ƙ|%ʞ|%Ʞ|%ｋ|%Ｋ] -> k || _ ,,
[%ļ|%Ļ|%𝐥|%𝐋|%𝑙|%𝐿|%𝒍|%𝑳|%𝓁|%𝓵|%𝓛|%𝔩|%𝔏|%𝕝|%𝕃|%𝖑|%𝕷|%𝗅|%𝖫|%𝗹|%𝗟|%𝘭|%𝘓|%𝙡|%𝙇|%𝚕|%𝙻|%ł|%Ł|%ƚ|%Ƚ|%ȴ|%ɫ|%Ɫ|%ɬ|%Ɬ|%ɭ|%ʟ|%ｌ|%Ｌ] -> l || _ ,,
[%ḿ|%Ḿ|%ṁ|%Ṁ|%𝐦|%𝐌|%𝑚|%𝑀|%𝒎|%𝑴|%𝓂|%𝓶|%𝓜|%𝔪|%𝔐|%𝕞|%𝕄|%𝖒|%𝕸|%𝗆|%𝖬|%𝗺|%𝗠|%𝘮|%𝘔|%𝙢|%𝙈|%𝚖|%𝙼|%ɯ|%Ɯ|%ɰ|%ɱ|%Ɱ|%ｍ|%Ｍ] -> m || _ ,,
[%ǹ|%Ǹ|%ń|%Ń|%ñ|%ṅ|%Ṅ|%ņ|%Ņ|%𝐧|%𝐍|%𝑛|%𝑁|%𝒏|%𝑵|%𝓃|%𝒩|%𝓷|%𝓝|%𝔫|%𝔑|%𝕟|%𝖓|%𝕹|%𝗇|%𝖭|%𝗻|%𝗡|%𝘯|%𝘕|%𝙣|%𝙉|%𝚗|%𝙽|%ɲ|%Ɲ|%ƞ|%Ƞ|%ȵ|%ɳ|%ɴ|%ｎ|%Ｎ] -> n || _ ,,
[%ò|%õ|%ṍ|%Ṍ|%ȭ|%Ȭ|%ṏ|%Ṏ|%ō|%Ō|%ṑ|%Ṑ|%ṓ|%Ṓ|%ǭ|%Ǭ|%ŏ|%Ŏ|%ȯ|%Ȯ|%ȱ|%Ȱ|%ỏ|%Ỏ|%ő|%Ő|%ǒ|%Ǒ|%ȍ|%Ȍ|%ȏ|%Ȏ|%ǫ|%Ǫ|%ǭ|%Ǭ|%𝐨|%𝐎|%𝑜|%𝑂|%𝒐|%𝑶|%𝒪|%𝓸|%𝓞|%𝔬|%𝔒|%𝕠|%𝕆|%𝖔|%𝕺|%𝗈|%𝖮|%𝗼|%𝗢|%𝘰|%𝘖|%𝙤|%𝙊|%𝚘|%𝙾|%ɔ|%Ɔ|%ɵ|%Ɵ|%ｏ|%Ｏ] -> o || _ ,,
[%ṕ|%Ṕ|%ṗ|%Ṗ|%𝐩|%𝐏|%𝑝|%𝑃|%𝒑|%𝑷|%𝓅|%𝒫|%𝓹|%𝓟|%𝔭|%𝔓|%𝕡|%𝖕|%𝕻|%𝗉|%𝖯|%𝗽|%𝗣|%𝘱|%𝘗|%𝙥|%𝙋|%𝚙|%𝙿|%ƥ|%Ƥ|%ｐ|%Ｐ] -> p || _ ,,
[%𝐪|%𝐐|%𝑞|%𝑄|%𝒒|%𝑸|%𝓆|%𝒬|%𝓺|%𝓠|%𝔮|%𝔔|%𝕢|%𝖖|%𝕼|%𝗊|%𝖰|%𝗾|%𝗤|%𝘲|%𝘘|%𝙦|%𝙌|%𝚚|%𝚀|%ɋ|%Ɋ|%ʠ|%ｑ|%Ｑ] -> q || _ ,,
[%ṙ|%Ṙ|%ȑ|%Ȑ|%ȓ|%Ȓ|%ŗ|%Ŗ|%𝐫|%𝐑|%𝑟|%𝑅|%𝒓|%𝑹|%𝓇|%𝓻|%𝓡|%𝔯|%𝕣|%𝖗|%𝕽|%𝗋|%𝖱|%𝗿|%𝗥|%𝘳|%𝘙|%𝙧|%𝙍|%𝚛|%𝚁|%ɍ|%Ɍ|%ɹ|%ɺ|%ɻ|%ɼ|%ɽ|%Ɽ|%ɾ|%ɿ|%ʁ|%ｒ|%Ｒ] -> r || _ ,,
[%ś|%Ś|%ṥ|%Ṥ|%ŝ|%Ŝ|%ṡ|%Ṡ|%ș|%Ș|%ş|%Ş|%𝐬|%𝐒|%𝑠|%𝑆|%𝒔|%𝑺|%𝓈|%𝒮|%𝓼|%𝓢|%𝔰|%𝔖|%𝕤|%𝕊|%𝖘|%𝕾|%𝗌|%𝖲|%𝘀|%𝗦|%𝘴|%𝘚|%𝙨|%𝙎|%𝚜|%𝚂|%ȿ|%Ȿ|%ʂ|%Ʂ|%ｓ|%Ｓ] -> s || _ ,,
[%ṫ|%Ṫ|%ẗ|%ț|%Ț|%ţ|%Ţ|%𝐭|%𝐓|%𝑡|%𝑇|%𝒕|%𝑻|%𝓉|%𝒯|%𝓽|%𝓣|%𝔱|%𝔗|%𝕥|%𝕋|%𝖙|%𝕿|%𝗍|%𝖳|%𝘁|%𝗧|%𝘵|%𝘛|%𝙩|%𝙏|%𝚝|%𝚃|%ŧ|%Ŧ|%ƫ|%ƭ|%Ƭ|%ʈ|%Ʈ|%ȶ|%ⱦ|%Ⱦ|%ʇ|%Ʇ|%ｔ|%Ｔ] -> t || _ ,,
[%ù|%û|%ũ|%Ũ|%ṹ|%Ṹ|%ū|%Ū|%ṻ|%Ṻ|%ŭ|%Ŭ|%ủ|%Ủ|%ű|%Ű|%ǔ|%Ǔ|%ȕ|%Ȕ|%ȗ|%Ȗ|%ų|%Ų|%𝐮|%𝐔|%𝑢|%𝑈|%𝒖|%𝑼|%𝓊|%𝒰|%𝓾|%𝓤|%𝔲|%𝔘|%𝕦|%𝕌|%𝖚|%𝖀|%𝗎|%𝖴|%𝘂|%𝗨|%𝘶|%𝘜|%𝙪|%𝙐|%𝚞|%𝚄|%ʉ|%Ʉ|%ｕ|%Ｕ] -> u || _ ,,
[%ṽ|%Ṽ|%𝐯|%𝐕|%𝑣|%𝑉|%𝒗|%𝑽|%𝓋|%𝒱|%𝓿|%𝓥|%𝔳|%𝔙|%𝕧|%𝕍|%𝖛|%𝖁|%𝗏|%𝖵|%𝘃|%𝗩|%𝘷|%𝘝|%𝙫|%𝙑|%𝚟|%𝚅|%ʋ|%Ʋ|%ʌ|%Ʌ|%ｖ|%Ｖ] -> v || _ ,,
[%ẁ|%Ẁ|%ẃ|%Ẃ|%ŵ|%Ŵ|%ẇ|%Ẇ|%ẅ|%Ẅ|%ẘ|%𝐰|%𝐖|%𝑤|%𝑊|%𝒘|%𝑾|%𝓌|%𝒲|%𝔀|%𝓦|%𝔴|%𝔚|%𝕨|%𝕎|%𝖜|%𝖂|%𝗐|%𝖶|%𝘄|%𝗪|%𝘸|%𝘞|%𝙬|%𝙒|%𝚠|%𝚆|%ʍ|%ｗ|%Ｗ] -> w || _ ,,
[%ẋ|%Ẋ|%ẍ|%Ẍ|%𝐱|%𝐗|%𝑥|%𝑋|%𝒙|%𝑿|%𝓍|%𝒳|%𝔁|%𝓧|%𝔵|%𝔛|%𝕩|%𝕏|%𝖝|%𝖃|%𝗑|%𝖷|%𝘅|%𝗫|%𝘹|%𝘟|%𝙭|%𝙓|%𝚡|%𝚇|%ｘ|%Ｘ] -> x || _ ,,
[%ỳ|%Ỳ|%ŷ|%Ŷ|%ỹ|%Ỹ|%ȳ|%Ȳ|%ẏ|%Ẏ|%ÿ|%Ÿ|%ỷ|%Ỷ|%ẙ|%𝐲|%𝐘|%𝑦|%𝑌|%𝒚|%𝒀|%𝓎|%𝒴|%𝔂|%𝓨|%𝔶|%𝔜|%𝕪|%𝕐|%𝖞|%𝖄|%𝗒|%𝖸|%𝘆|%𝗬|%𝘺|%𝘠|%𝙮|%𝙔|%𝚢|%𝚈|%ƴ|%Ƴ|%ɏ|%Ɏ|%ʎ|%ʏ|%ｙ|%Ｙ] -> y || _ ,,
[%ź|%Ź|%ẑ|%Ẑ|%ż|%Ż|%𝐳|%𝐙|%𝑧|%𝑍|%𝒛|%𝒁|%𝓏|%𝒵|%𝔃|%𝓩|%𝔷|%𝕫|%𝖟|%𝖅|%𝗓|%𝖹|%𝘇|%𝗭|%𝘻|%𝘡|%𝙯|%𝙕|%𝚣|%𝚉|%ƶ|%Ƶ|%ȥ|%Ȥ|%ɀ|%Ɀ|%ʐ|%ʑ|%ｚ|%Ｚ] -> z || _ ,,
[%ƻ] -> 2 || _ ;
